Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 1

General Provisions

44-16-101. Hatchery and baby chick inspection service — Rules and regulations — Trademarks — Inspection fees.

The department of agriculture shall organize, under the division of animal disease control, a poultry hatchery and baby chick inspection service, and the commissioner of agriculture shall prescribe such rules and regulations in conformity with recognized standards and establish such trademarks as may be necessary or proper to effect this service, and fix reasonable inspection fees to provide for the expense of the service.

Acts 1925, ch. 138, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 373a77; Code 1932, § 300; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1801.

Cross-References. Humane treatment of animals not subject to state game and fish laws, §5-9-110.

Comparative Legislation. Hatcheries and baby chicks:

Ala. Code §2-16-1 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §4-7-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 257.320 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §69-7-201 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 196.313.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 106-539 et seq.

Va. Code § 3.1-763.14 et seq.

Collateral References. Animals
29.

44-16-102. Certification as accredited flock and hatchery.

Each poultry flock inspected and meeting the standard requirements thus fixed shall be certified by the department as an accredited flock, and each hatchery using eggs from accredited flocks only, and otherwise meeting the standard requirements, shall be certified by the department as an accredited hatchery.

Acts 1925, ch. 138, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 373a78; Code 1932, § 301; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1802.

44-16-103. Inspector of poultry flocks, hatcheries, and baby chicks — Assistants — Compensation.

The commissioner of agriculture is authorized, for the carrying out of this part, to appoint a state poultry flock, hatchery, and baby chick inspector and necessary assistants, and to fix their compensation; provided, that no expense shall be incurred or paid on account of this service in excess of the revenue derived from the service.

Acts 1925, ch. 138, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 373a79; Code 1932, § 302; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1803.

44-16-104. Inspection fees paid into state treasury for expenses — Surplus for poultry education and investigation.

The revenue derived from the inspection fees authorized in §44-16-101 shall be paid into the state treasury by the commissioner and placed to the credit of a special poultry inspection account, which may be drawn on by the department of agriculture to meet the expenses of the service provided for in this part, and if there should be a surplus remaining, it may be expended by the commissioner for poultry educational and investigational purposes.

Acts 1925, ch. 138, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 373a80; Code 1932, § 303; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 44-1804.